Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.311

Validation of proceedings to effect dissolution, annexation, consolidation, or transfer of territory between districts.

All proceedings that have been taken by any school district, educational service district governing body, or commission, or any officers thereof, for the purpose of effecting a dissolution, annexation, consolidation, or transfer of territory from one or more school districts to one or more other school districts, including but not limited to reorganizing boundaries and making an equitable adjustment of the property and other assets and of the liabilities, including bonded indebtedness and excess tax levies, are hereby validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, notwithstanding any lack of power, other than constitutional, of the school district, educational service district, or the governing body or commission or officers thereof to effect such changes in organization of school districts.

[ 2012 c 186 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.